Massachusetts, session 194th, S2574.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. (a) Notwithstanding Section 9 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, and in order to promote the public good, there shall be
paid an accidental death benefit from the Boston Retirement Board to Rachel Marie Troy, the
surviving spouse of Mathew M. Troy, a former Firefighter of the City of Boston, who died as a
result of a condition of impairment of health, including Cholangiocarcinoma, suffered while
performing the essential duties of a Firefighter. The benefits shall be paid and administered in
accordance with Section 9 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws. Rachel Marie Troy shall receive a
lump sum payment from the Boston Retirement Board equal to the total accumulate retirement
deductions paid by Mathew M. Troy into the annuity savings fund.
Section 2. Such an accidental death benefit allowance shall consist of a yearly amount of
pension equal to seventy-two percent of the annual rate of regular compensation of such member
on the date such injury was sustained or such hazard was undergone, or equal to seventy-two
of 2

percent of the average annual rate of compensation for the twelve-month period for which he last
received regular compensation immediately preceding the date of his death, whichever is greater.
Section 3. Rachel Marie Troy, the surviving spouse of Mathew M. Troy, a former
Firefighter of the City of Boston, shall be afforded the opportunity to retain medical insurance
coverage equivalent to such coverage that Matthew M. Troy would have been entitled to if he
had retired from the City of Boston.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage
of 2